Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-745
Vocational educational needs; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the schools in this state may best serve their students' vocational educational needs by participating in cooperative agreements with other school districts in order to share resources and programs. The Legislature further finds that recent technology, including computer developments, are expanding rapidly and students should be exposed at the elementary and secondary school levels to such technological advances in order to complete their education and prepare them for the future.

Laws 1983, LB 207, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1435.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 419.